Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.18
State Building Administrator; parking of motor vehicles; rules and regulations; violations; personal responsibility for violation.

In order to promote the public safety and welfare, the administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the parking of motor vehicles on the (1) approaches to the capitol, in consultation with the State Capitol Administrator, and (2) lands owned or leased by the State of Nebraska and under the State Building Administrator's control. The rules and regulations may limit, restrict, or prohibit parking on such land. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, the rules and regulations shall become effective upon posting notice of the rules and regulations on or about the premises to be regulated. If any vehicle is found upon any regulated premises in violation of this section or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section and the driver cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose name such vehicle is registered shall be held responsible for such violation.

Laws 1955, c. 278, § 2, p. 880;

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 24, p. 1713;

Laws 1967, c. 468, § 2, p. 1459;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-706.01;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 9;

Laws 1976, LB 986, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 303;

Laws 1979, LB 576, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 20.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.